Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. Corporate Purposes and Powers.

Sec. 10.06.005.
Purposes.

A corporation may be organized under this chapter for any lawful purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 97 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 1999)

Sec. 10.06.010.
General powers.

Subject to the limitations in its articles of incorporation, the provisions of this chapter and other applicable law, a corporation has all the powers of a natural person in carrying out its business activities, including, without limitation, the power to

have perpetual succession by its corporate name;

sue and be sued in its corporate name;

adopt a corporate seal and alter it, and use it by having it or a facsimile of it impressed, affixed, or reproduced;

buy, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal in, real or personal property or an interest in the property, wherever situated;

sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of all or a part of its property and assets;

lend money, if properly approved, to its employees, officers, and directors, and otherwise assist its employees, officers, and directors;

buy, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, associations, partnerships, or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality or an instrumentality of these;

make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money at the rates of interest the corporation determines, issue notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchise and income;

lend money for its corporate purposes, invest and reinvest its money, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of money loaned or invested;

conduct business, carry on operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter in a state, territory, district, or possession of the United States, or in a foreign country;

elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation and define their duties and fix their compensation;

make and alter bylaws not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with state law, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation;

donate for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes, and in time of war donate in aid of war activities;

transact lawful business in time of war in aid of the United States in the prosecution of the war;

pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit-sharing plans, stock bonus plans, stock option plans and other incentive plans for its directors, officers, and employees;

cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise;

have and exercise the powers of a limited or general partner or a joint venturer in association with one or more persons, corporations, partnerships, or associations;

have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes for which the corporation is organized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.015.
Defense of ultra vires.

An act of a corporation or a transfer of real or personal property to or by a corporation, otherwise lawful, is not invalid because the corporation was without capacity or power to do the act or to make or receive the transfer, but the lack of capacity or power may be asserted

in an action by a shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the doing of an act or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation; if the unauthorized act or transfer sought to be enjoined is being, or is to be, performed or made under a contract to which the corporation is a party, the court may, if all of the parties to the contract are parties to the action, set aside and enjoin the performance of the contract, and in so doing may allow to the corporation or to the other parties to the contract, compensation as may be equitable for the loss or damage sustained by any of them from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of the contract; however, anticipated profits to be derived from the contract may not be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained;

in an action by or in the right of the corporation to obtain a judgment in its favor against an incumbent or former officer, director, or incorporator of the corporation for loss or damage due to that individual’s unauthorized act;

in an action or special proceeding by the commissioner to annul or dissolve the corporation or to enjoin it from the doing of unauthorized business.

This section applies to contracts and conveyances made by foreign corporations in this state and to conveyances by foreign corporations of real property situated in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of (a)(1) of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 19, see sec. 15, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.020.
Limitations on powers of shareholders, officers, and directors.

A limitation upon the powers of the shareholders, officers, or directors, or the manner or exercise of their powers, contained in or implied by the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or action of the board, or by AS

10.06.605

—

10.06.678

or

10.06.705

—

10.06.788

or by a shareholders’ agreement may not be asserted as between the corporation or a shareholder and a third person, except in a proceeding

by a shareholder or the state to enjoin the doing or continuance of unauthorized business by the corporation or its officers, or both, in a case where a third party has not acquired rights under AS

10.06.025(a)

;

to dissolve the corporation; or

by the corporation or by a shareholder suing in a representative suit against the officers or directors of the corporation for violation of their duty.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.025.
Contracts or conveyances binding domestic and foreign corporations.

A contract or conveyance made in the name of the corporation that is authorized or ratified by the board, or is done within the scope of the authority, actual or apparent, conferred by the board or within the agency power of the officers executing it, except as the board’s authority is limited by law, binds the corporation, and the corporation acquires rights under the contract, whether the contract is executed or is wholly or in part executory.

This section applies to contracts and conveyances made by foreign corporations in this state and to conveyances by foreign corporations of real property situated in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 1989)